District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

25-1004

Prohibition on use of watercraft under certain conditions.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-248, §§ 2, 7, 44 DCR 1242
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-195, § 3(a), 53 DCR 8675
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 302, 59 DCR 12957
1981 Ed., § 25-1004.
D.C. Law 16-195, in subsec. (a), rewrote par. (1) and repealed par. (2).
Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-201 added §§ 25-127.1 through 25-127.6.
Section 10(b) of D.C Law 11-201 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 25-127.1 through 25-127.6, see § 2-7 of the Boating While Intoxicated Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-346, August 8, 1996, 43 DCR 4621), § 2-7 of the Boating While Intoxicated Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-411, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6063) and §§ 2-7 of the Boating While Intoxicated Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-469, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 179).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-469, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-518, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9104).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Anti-Drunk Driving Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-6, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1452).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 302 of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary repeal of §§ 25-1004 through 25-1009, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For present law, see § 50-1908 et seq.